California statutes. Civil Code
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Mode of Transfer [1052. - 1059.]

1052.

A transfer may be made without writing, in every case in which a writing is not expressly required by statute.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

[1053.]

Section Ten Hundred and Fifty-three. A transfer in writing is called a grant, or conveyance, or bill of sale. The term “grant,” in this and the next two Articles, includes all these instruments, unless it is specially applied to real property.

(History: Amended by Code Amendments 1873-74, Ch. 612.)
-------------------------------------------

1054.

A grant takes effect, so as to vest the interest intended to be transferred, only upon its delivery by the grantor.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1055.

A grant duly executed is presumed to have been delivered at its date.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1056.

A grant cannot be delivered to the grantee conditionally. Delivery to him, or to his agent as such, is necessarily absolute, and the instrument takes effect thereupon, discharged of any condition on which the delivery was made.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1057.

A grant may be deposited by the grantor with a third person, to be delivered on performance of a condition, and, on delivery by the depositary, it will take effect. While in the possession of the third person, and subject to condition, it is called an escrow.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1057.3.

(a) It shall be the obligation of a buyer and seller who enter into a contract to purchase and sell real property to ensure that all funds deposited into an escrow account are returned to the person who deposited the funds or who is otherwise entitled to the funds under the contract, if the purchase of the property is not completed by the date set forth in the contract for the close of escrow or any duly executed extension thereof.

(b) Any buyer or seller who fails to execute any document required by the escrow holder to release funds on deposit in an escrow
 account as provided in subdivision (a) within 30 days following a written demand for the return of funds deposited in escrow by the other party shall be liable to the person making the deposit for all of the following:

(1) The amount of the funds deposited in escrow not held in good faith to resolve a good faith dispute.

(2) Damages of treble the amount of the funds deposited in escrow not held to resolve a good faith dispute, but liability under this paragraph shall not be less than one hundred dollars ($100) or more than one thousand dollars ($1,000). 

(3) Reasonable attorney’s fees incurred in any action to enforce this section. 

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), there shall be no cause of action under this section, and no party to a contract to
 purchase and sell real property shall be liable, for failure to return funds deposited in an escrow account by a buyer or seller, if the funds are withheld in order to resolve a good faith dispute between a buyer and seller. A party who is denied the return of the funds deposited in escrow is entitled to damages under this section only upon proving that there was no good faith dispute as to the right to the funds on deposit.

(d) Upon the filing of a cause of action pursuant to this section, the escrow holder shall deposit the sum in dispute, less any cancellation fee and charges incurred, with the court in which the action is filed and be discharged of further responsibility for the funds.

(e) Neither any document required by the escrow holder to release funds deposited in an escrow account nor the acceptance of funds released from escrow, by any principal to the escrow
 transaction, shall be deemed a cancellation or termination of the underlying contract to purchase and sell real property, unless the cancellation is specifically stated therein. If the escrow instructions constitute the only contract between the buyer and seller, no document required by the escrow holder to release funds deposited in an escrow account shall abrogate a cause of action for breach of a contractual obligation to purchase or sell real property, unless the cancellation is specifically stated therein.

(f) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Close of escrow” means the date, specified event, or performance of prescribed condition upon which the escrow agent is to deliver the subject of the escrow to the person specified in the buyer’s instructions to the escrow agent. 

(2) “Good faith dispute” means a dispute
 in which the trier of fact finds that the party refusing to return the deposited funds had a reasonable belief of his or her legal entitlement to withhold the deposited funds. The existence of a “good faith dispute” shall be determined by the trier of fact.

(3) “Property” means real property containing one to four residential units at least one of which at the time the escrow is created is to be occupied by the buyer. The buyer’s statement as to his or her intention to occupy one of the units is conclusive for the purposes of this section.

(g) Nothing in this section restricts the ability of an escrow holder to file an interpleader action in the event of a dispute as to the proper distribution of funds deposited in an escrow account.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 13, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1057.5.

Except for the normal compensation of his own employees, no person acting as an escrow agent whether required to be licensed as such or not, shall pay over to any other person any commission, fee, or other consideration as compensation for referring, soliciting, handling, or servicing escrow customers or accounts.

No escrow agent shall enter into any arrangement, either of his own making or of a subsidiary nature, or through any other person having a dual capacity, or through any person having a direct or indirect interest in the escrow, or other device, permitting any fee, commission, or compensation which is contingent upon
 the performance of any act, condition, or instruction set forth in an escrow, to be drawn or paid, either in whole or in part, or in kind or its equivalent, prior to the actual closing and completion of the escrow.

The provisions of this section shall not be deemed to supersede, negate, or modify any of the provisions of Section 12404 of the Insurance Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 678.)
-------------------------------------------

1057.6.

In an escrow transaction for the purchase or simultaneous exchange of real property, where a policy of title insurance will not be issued to the buyer or to the parties to the exchange, the following notice shall be provided in a separate document to the buyer or parties exchanging real property, which shall be signed and acknowledged by them:

“IMPORTANT: IN A PURCHASE OR EXCHANGE OF REAL PROPERTY, IT MAY BE ADVISABLE TO OBTAIN TITLE INSURANCE IN CONNECTION WITH THE CLOSE OF ESCROW SINCE THERE MAY BE PRIOR RECORDED
 LIENS AND ENCUMBRANCES WHICH AFFECT YOUR INTEREST IN THE PROPERTY BEING ACQUIRED. A NEW POLICY OF TITLE INSURANCE SHOULD BE OBTAINED IN ORDER TO ENSURE YOUR INTEREST IN THE PROPERTY THAT YOU ARE ACQUIRING.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 194, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

1057.7.

All written escrow instructions executed by a buyer or seller, whether prepared by a person subject to Division 6 (commencing with Section 17000) of the Financial Code, or by a person exempt from that division under Section 17006 of the Financial Code, shall contain a statement in not less than 10-point type which shall include the license name and the name of the department issuing the license or authority under which the person is operating. This section shall not apply to supplemental escrow instructions or modifications to escrow instructions.

This section shall become operative on July 1, 1993.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 861, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Section operative July 1, 1993, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

1058.

Redelivering a grant of real property to the grantor, or canceling it, does not operate to retransfer the title.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1058.5.

(a) A notice of nonacceptance of a recorded deed executed by a holder of a security interest, which notice identifies the security interest, contains a legal description of the property, properly identifies the parties to the deed, the date of recordation of the deed, the county in which the project is located, and the county assessor’s parcel number of the real property referenced in the deed, may be recorded in the office of the county recorder where the real property is located.

(b) Where a trustee’s deed is invalidated by a pending bankruptcy or otherwise, recordation of a notice of rescission of the trustee’s deed, which notice properly identifies the deed of trust, the identification numbers used by the recorder or the books and pages at which the trustee’s deed and deed of trust are recorded, the names of all trustors and beneficiaries, the location of the property subject to the deed of trust, and the reason for rescission, shall restore the condition of record title to the real property described in the trustee’s deed and the existence and priority of all lienholders to the status quo prior to the recordation of the trustee’s deed upon sale. Only the trustee or beneficiary who caused the trustee’s deed to be recorded, or his or her successor in interest, may record a notice of rescission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 74, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

1059.

Though a grant be not actually delivered into the possession of the grantee, it is yet to be deemed constructively delivered in the following cases:

1. Where the instrument is, by the agreement of the parties at the time of execution, understood to be delivered, and under such circumstances that the grantee is entitled to immediate delivery; or,

2. Where it is delivered to a stranger for the benefit of the grantee, and his assent is shown, or may be presumed.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Interpretation of Grants [1066. - 1072.]

1066.

Grants are to be interpreted in like manner with contracts in general, except so far as is otherwise provided in this Article.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1067.

A clear and distinct limitation in a grant is not controlled by other words less clear and distinct.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1068.

If the operative words of a grant are doubtful, recourse may be had to its recitals to assist the construction.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1069.

A grant is to be interpreted in favor of the grantee, except that a reservation in any grant, and every grant by a public officer or body, as such, to a private party, is to be interpreted in favor of the grantor.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1070.

If several parts of a grant are absolutely irreconcilable, the former part prevails.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1072.

Words of inheritance or succession are not requisite to transfer a fee in real property.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Effect of Transfer [1084. - 1085.]

1084.

The transfer of a thing transfers also all its incidents, unless expressly excepted; but the transfer of an incident to a thing does not transfer the thing itself.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1085.

A present interest, and the benefit of a condition or covenant respecting property, may be taken by any natural person under a grant, although not named a party thereto.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Agency Listings for the Transfer of Certain Property [1086. - 1089.5.]

1086.

(a) For purposes of this article, the definitions contained in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 10000) of Part 1 of Division 4 of the Business and Professions Code apply.

(b) An “agent” is one authorized by law to act in that capacity for that type of property and is licensed as a real estate broker under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 10130) of
 Part 1 of Division 4 of the Business and Professions Code, or is a licensee, as defined in Section 18006 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 907, Sec. 1.   (AB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

1087.

A multiple listing service (MLS) is a facility of cooperation of agents and appraisers, operating through an intermediary that does not itself act as an agent or appraiser, through which agents establish express or implied contracts for compensation between agents that are MLS participants in accordance with its MLS rules with respect to listed properties in a listing agreement, or that may be used by agents and appraisers, pursuant to
 the rules of the service, to prepare market evaluations and appraisals of real property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 907, Sec. 2.   (AB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

1088.

(a) A listing may not be placed in a multiple listing service unless authorized or directed by the seller in the listing.

(b) If an agent or appraiser places a listing or other information in the multiple listing service, that agent or appraiser shall be responsible for the truth of all representations and
 statements made by the agent or appraiser of which that agent or appraiser had knowledge or reasonably should have had knowledge to anyone injured by their falseness or inaccuracy.

(c) A multiple listing service shall retain and make accessible on its computer system, if any, all listing and other information placed in the multiple listing service by an agent or appraiser for no less than three years from the date the listing was placed in the multiple listing service.

(d) This section shall not alter the obligations of a licensed real estate broker to retain documents as specified in subdivision (a) of Section 10148 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 310, Sec. 1.   (AB 892)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1089.

The provisions of subdivision (d) of Section 1102.1 shall apply to this article.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 907, Sec. 5.   (AB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

1089.5.

Subject to the limitations, conditions, and requirements of Chapter 18 (commencing with Section 10000) of Part 5 of Division 7 of the Probate Code, this article applies to property defined in Section 1086 that is covered by a contract described in Section 10150 of the Probate Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 113, Sec. 4.   Effective May 25, 1988.   Operative July 1, 1988, by Sec. 23 of Ch. 113.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Unlawful Influence of Appraisers [1090.5. - 1090.5.]

1090.5.

(a) No person with an interest in a real estate transaction involving a valuation shall improperly influence or attempt to improperly influence the development, reporting, result, or review of that valuation, through coercion, extortion, bribery, intimidation, compensation, or instruction. For purposes of this section, a valuation is defined as an estimate of the value of real property in written or
 electronic form, other than one produced solely by an automated valuation model or system. Prohibited acts include, but are not limited to, the following:

(1) Seeking to influence a person who prepares a valuation to report a minimum or maximum value for the property being valued. Such influence may include, but is not limited to:

(A) Requesting that a person provide a preliminary estimate or opinion of value prior to entering into a contract with that person for valuation services.

(B) Conditioning whether to hire a person based on an expectation of the value conclusion likely to be returned by that person.

(C) Conditioning the amount of a person’s compensation on the value conclusion returned by that person.

(D) Providing to a person an anticipated, estimated, encouraged, or desired valuation prior to their completion of a valuation.

(2) Withholding or threatening to withhold timely payment to a person or entity that prepares a valuation, or provides valuation management functions, because that person or entity does not return a value at or above a certain amount.

(3) Implying to a person who prepares a valuation that current or future retention of that person depends on the amount at which the person estimates the value of real property.

(4) Excluding a person who prepares a valuation from consideration for future engagement because the person reports a value that does not meet or exceed a predetermined threshold.

(5) Conditioning the compensation paid to a person who prepares a valuation on consummation of the real estate transaction for which the valuation is prepared.

(6) Requesting the payment of compensation to achieve higher priority in the assignment of valuation business.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not prohibit a person with an interest in a real estate transaction from doing any of the following:

(1) Asking a person who performs a valuation to do any of the following:

(A) Consider additional, appropriate property information, including information about comparable properties.

(B) Provide further detail, substantiation, or explanation
 for the person’s value conclusion.

(C) Correct errors in a valuation report.

(2) Obtaining multiple valuations, for purposes of selecting the most reliable valuation.

(3) Withholding compensation due to breach of contract or substandard performance of services.

(4) Providing a copy of the sales contract in connection with a purchase transaction.

(c) If a person who violates this section is licensed or registered under any state licensing or registration law and the violation occurs within the course and scope of the person’s duties as a licensee or registrant, the violation shall be deemed a violation of that law.

(d) Nothing
 in this section shall be construed to authorize communications that are otherwise prohibited under existing law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 716, Sec. 5.   (SB 6)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Transfer of Real Property [1091. - 1134.]



  ARTICLE 1. Mode of Transfer [1091. - 1099.]

1091.

An estate in real property, other than an estate at will or for a term not exceeding one year, can be transferred only by operation of law, or by an instrument in writing, subscribed by the party disposing of the same, or by his agent thereunto authorized by writing.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1092.

A grant of an estate in real property may be made in substance as follows:

“I, AB, grant to CD all that real property situated in (insert name of county) County, State of California, bounded (or described) as follows: (here insert property description, or if the land sought to be conveyed has a descriptive name, it may be described by the name, as for instance, ‛The Norris Ranch.’)Witness my hand this (insert day) day of (insert month), 
20___.AB”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 608, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

1093.

Absent the express written statement of the grantor contained therein, the consolidation of separate and distinct legal descriptions of real property contained in one or more deeds, mortgages, patents, deeds of trust, contracts of sale, or other instruments of conveyance or security documents, into a subsequent single deed, mortgage, patent, deed of trust, contract of sale, or other instrument of conveyance or security document (whether by means of an individual listing of the legal descriptions in a subsequent single instrument of conveyance or security document, or by means of a consolidated legal description comprised of more than one previously
 separate and distinct legal description), does not operate in any manner to alter or affect the separate and distinct nature of the real property so described in the subsequent single instrument of conveyance or security document containing either the listing of or the consolidated legal description of the parcels so conveyed or secured thereby.

This section does not constitute a change in, but is declaratory of, the existing law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 911, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1095.

When an attorney in fact executes an instrument transferring an estate in real property, he must subscribe the name of his principal to it, and his own name as attorney in fact.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1096.

Any person in whom the title of real estate is vested, who shall afterwards, from any cause, have his or her name changed, must, in any conveyance of said real estate so held, set forth the name in which he or she derived title to said real estate. Any conveyance, though recorded as provided by law, which does not comply with the foregoing provision shall not impart constructive notice of the contents thereof to subsequent purchasers and encumbrancers, but such conveyance is valid as between the parties thereto and those who have notice thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1947, Ch. 1314.)
-------------------------------------------

1097.

No vendor or lessor of a single family residential property shall contract for or exact any fee in excess of ten dollars ($10) for the act of signing and delivering a document in connection with the transfer, cancellation or reconveyance of any title or instrument at the time the buyer or lessee exercises an option to buy, or completes performance of the contract for the sale of, the property.

The provisions of this section shall apply prospectively only.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

1098.

(a) A “transfer fee” is any fee payment requirement imposed within a covenant, restriction, or condition contained in any deed, contract, security instrument, or other document affecting the transfer or sale of, or any interest in, real property that requires a fee be paid as a result of transfer of the real property. A transfer fee does not include any of the following:

(1) Fees or taxes imposed by a governmental entity.

(2) Fees pursuant to mechanics’ liens.

(3) Fees pursuant to court-ordered transfers, payments, or judgments.

(4) Fees pursuant to property agreements in connection with a legal separation or dissolution of marriage.

(5) Fees, charges, or payments in connection with the administration of estates or trusts pursuant to Division 7 (commencing with Section 7000), Division 8 (commencing with Section 13000), or Division 9 (commencing with Section 15000) of the Probate Code.

(6) Fees, charges, or payments imposed by lenders or purchasers of loans, as these entities are described in
 subdivision (c) of Section 10232 of the Business and Professions Code.

(7) Assessments, charges, penalties, or fees authorized by the Davis-Stirling Common Interest Development Act (Part 5 (commencing with Section 4000) of Division 4) or by the Commercial and Industrial Common Interest Development Act (Part 5.3 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 4).

(8) Fees, charges, or payments for failing to comply with, or for transferring the real property prior to satisfying, an obligation to construct residential improvements on the real property.

(9) (A) Any fee reflected in a document recorded against the property on or before December 31, 2007, that is separate from any covenants, conditions, and restrictions, and that substantially complies with subdivision (a) of Section 1098.5 by providing a
 prospective transferee notice of the following:

(i) Payment of a transfer fee is required.

(ii) The amount or method of calculation of the fee.

(iii) The date or circumstances under which the transfer fee payment requirement expires, if any.

(iv) The entity to which the fee will be paid.

(v) The general purposes for which the fee will be used.

(B) A fee reflected in a document recorded against the property on or before December 31, 2007, that is not separate from any covenants, conditions, and restrictions, or that incorporates by reference from another document, is a “transfer fee” for purposes of Section 1098.5. A transfer
 fee recorded against the property on or before December 31, 2007, that complies with subparagraph (A) and incorporates by reference from another document is unenforceable unless recorded against the property on or before December 31, 2016, in a single document that complies with subdivision (b) and with Section 1098.5.

(b) The information in paragraph (9) of subdivision (a) shall be set forth in a single document and shall not be incorporated by reference from any other document.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 634, Sec. 1.   (AB 807)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1098.5.

(a) For transfer fees, as defined in Section 1098, imposed prior to January 1, 2008, the receiver of the fee, as a condition of payment of the fee on or after January 1, 2009, shall record, on or before December 31, 2008, against the real property in the office of the county recorder for the county in which the real property is located a separate document that meets all of the following requirements:

(1) The title of the document shall be “Payment of Transfer Fee Required” in at least 14-point boldface type.

(2) The document shall include all of the following information:

(A) The names of all current owners of the real property subject to the transfer fee, and the legal description and assessor’s parcel number for the affected real property.

(B) The amount, if the fee is a flat amount, or the percentage of the sales price constituting the cost of the fee.

(C) If the real property is residential property, actual dollar-cost examples of the fee for a home priced at two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000), five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000), and seven hundred fifty thousand
 dollars ($750,000).

(D) The date or circumstances under which the transfer fee payment requirement expires, if any.

(E) The purpose for which the funds from the fee will be used.

(F) The entity to which funds from the fee will be paid and specific contact information regarding where the funds are to be sent.

(G) The signature of the authorized representative of the entity to which funds from the fee will be paid.

(b) When a transfer fee, as defined in Section 1098, is imposed upon real property on or after January 1, 2008, the person or entity imposing the transfer fee, as a condition of payment of the fee, shall record in the office of the county recorder for the county in which the real
 property is located, concurrently with the instrument creating the transfer fee requirement, a separate document that meets all of the following requirements:

(1) The title of the document shall be “Payment of Transfer Fee Required” in at least 14-point boldface type.

(2) The document shall include all of the following information:

(A) The names of all current owners of the real property subject to the transfer fee, and the legal description and assessor’s parcel number for the affected real property.

(B) The amount, if the fee is a flat amount, the percentage of the sales price constituting the cost of the fee, or the method for calculating the amount.

(C) If the real property is
 residential property and the amount of the fee is based on the price of the real property, actual dollar-cost examples of the fee for a home priced at two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000), five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000), and seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($750,000).

(D) The date or circumstances under which the transfer fee payment requirement expires, if any.

(E) The purpose for which the funds from the fee will be used.

(F) The entity to which funds from the fee will be paid and specific contact information regarding where the funds are to be sent.

(G) The signature of the authorized representative of the entity to which funds from the fee will be paid.

(H) For
 private transfer fees created on or after February 8, 2011, unless the exception in Section 1228.3 of Title 12 of the Code of Federal Regulations applies, the following notice in at least 14-point boldface type:

The Federal Housing Finance Agency and the Federal Housing Administration are prohibited from dealing in mortgages on properties encumbered by private transfer fee covenants that do not provide a “direct benefit” to the real property encumbered by the covenant. As a result, if you purchase such a property, you or individuals you want to sell the property to may have difficulty obtaining financing.

(c) The recorder shall only be responsible for examining that the document required by subdivision (a) or (b) contains the information required by subparagraphs (A), (F), and (G) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) or (b). The recorder shall index the document under the names of the persons and
 entities identified in subparagraphs (A) and (F) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) or (b). The recorder shall not examine any other information contained in the document required by subdivision (a) or (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 148, Sec. 1.   (AB 1139)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1098.6.

(a) (1) On or after January 1, 2019, a transfer fee shall not be created.

(2) This subdivision does not apply to excepted transfer fee covenants as defined by Section 1228.1 of Title 12 of the Code of Federal Regulations. Excepted transfer fee covenants are not required to comply with subparagraph (H) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 1098.5.

(3) This subdivision does not apply to a private transfer fee
 covenant if all of the following requirements are met:

(A) The covenant is created pursuant to an agreement entered into before June 1, 2009.

(B) The covenant is applicable to land that is identified in the
 agreement.

(C) The agreement was in settlement of litigation or approved by a government agency or body.

(D) The agreement was recorded in each county in which the land identified in the agreement is located.

(E) The agreement specifies the development area in which the covenant shall apply to any covered parcel to be created within that development area.

(F) The covenant complies with the requirements of Section 1098.5, except that the
 requirement of subparagraph (H) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 1098.5 does not apply.

(b) Any transfer fee created in violation of subdivision (a) is void as against public policy.

(c) For purposes of this section, “transfer fee” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 1098.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 475, Sec. 1.   (SB 1399)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1099.

(a) As soon as practical before transfer of title of any real property or the execution of a real property sales contract as defined in Section 2985, the transferor, fee owner, or his or her agent, shall deliver to the transferee a copy of a structural pest control inspection report prepared pursuant to Section 8516 of the Business and Professions Code upon which any certification in accordance with
 Section 8519 of the Business and Professions Code may be made, provided that certification or preparation of a report is a condition of the contract effecting that transfer, or is a requirement imposed as a condition of financing such transfer.

(b) If a notice of work completed as contemplated by Section 8518 of the Business and Professions Code, indicating action by a structural pest control licensee in response to an inspection report delivered or to be delivered under provisions of subdivision (a), or a certification pursuant to Section 8519 of the Business and Professions Code, has been received by a transferor or his or her agent before transfer of title or execution of a real property sales contract as defined in Section 2985, it shall be furnished to the transferee as soon as practical before transfer of title or the execution of such real property sales contract.

(c) Delivery to a transferee as used in this section means delivery in person or by mail to the transferee himself or herself or any person authorized to act for him or her in the transaction or to such additional transferees who have requested such delivery from the transferor or his or her agent in writing. For the purposes of this section, delivery to either spouse shall be deemed delivery to a transferee, unless the contract affecting the transfer states otherwise.

(d) No transfer of title of real property shall be invalidated solely because of the failure of any person to comply with the provisions of this section unless such failure is an act or omission which would be a valid ground for rescission of such transfer in the absence of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 50, Sec. 10.   (SB 1005)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.4. Installation of Water Use Efficiency Improvements [1101.1. - 1101.9.]

1101.1.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Adequate water supply reliability for all uses is essential to the future economic and environmental health of California.

(b) Environmentally sound strategies to meet future water supply and wastewater treatment needs are key to protecting and restoring aquatic resources in California.

(c) There is a pressing need to address water supply reliability issues raised by growing urban areas.

(d) Economic analysis by urban water agencies has identified urban water conservation as a cost-effective approach to addressing water supply needs.

(e) There are many water conservation practices that produce significant energy and other resource savings that should be encouraged as a matter of state policy.

(f) Since the 1991 signing of the “Memorandum of Understanding Regarding Urban Water Conservation in California,” many urban water and wastewater treatment agencies have gained valuable experience that can be applied to produce significant statewide savings of water, energy, and associated infrastructure costs. This experience indicates a need to
 regularly revise and update water conservation methodologies and practices.

(g) To address these concerns, it is the intent of the Legislature to require that residential and commercial real property built and available for use or occupancy on or before January 1, 1994, be equipped with water-conserving plumbing fixtures.

(h) It is further the intent of the Legislature that retail water suppliers are encouraged to provide incentives, financing mechanisms, and funding to assist property owners with these retrofit obligations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 587, Sec. 1.   (SB 407)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

1101.2.

Except as provided in Section 1101.7, this article shall apply to residential and commercial real property built and available for use on or before January 1, 1994.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 587, Sec. 1.   (SB 407)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

1101.3.

For the purposes of this article:

(a) “Commercial real property” means any real property that is improved with, or consisting of, a building that is intended for commercial use, including hotels and motels, that is not a single-family residential real property or a multifamily residential real property.

(b) “Multifamily residential real property” means
 any real property that is improved with, or consisting of, a building containing more than one unit that is intended for human habitation, or any mixed residential-commercial buildings or portions thereof that are intended for human habitation. Multifamily residential real property includes residential hotels but does not include hotels and motels that are not residential hotels.

(c) “Noncompliant plumbing fixture” means any of the following:

(1) Any toilet manufactured to use more than 1.6 gallons of water per flush.

(2) Any urinal manufactured to use more than one gallon of water per flush.

(3) Any showerhead manufactured to have a flow capacity of more than 2.5 gallons of water per minute.

(4) Any interior faucet that emits more than 2.2 gallons of water per minute.

(d) “Single-family residential real property” means any real property that is improved with, or consisting of, a building containing not more than one unit that is intended for human habitation.

(e) “Water-conserving plumbing fixture” means any fixture that is in compliance with current building standards applicable to a newly constructed real property of the same type.

(f) “Sale or transfer” means the sale or transfer of an entire real property estate or the fee interest in that real property estate and does not include the sale or transfer of a partial interest, including a leasehold.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 587, Sec. 1.   (SB 407)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

1101.4.

(a) For all building alterations or improvements to single-family residential real property, as a condition for issuance of a certificate of final completion and occupancy or final permit approval by the local building department, the permit applicant shall replace all noncompliant plumbing fixtures with water-conserving plumbing fixtures.

(b) On or before January 1, 2017, noncompliant plumbing fixtures in any single-family residential real property shall be replaced by the property owner with water-conserving plumbing fixtures.

(c) A seller or transferor of single-family residential real property shall disclose in writing to the prospective purchaser or transferee the requirements of subdivision (b) and whether the real property includes any noncompliant plumbing fixtures.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 310, Sec. 2.   (AB 892)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1101.5.

(a) On or before January 1, 2019, all noncompliant plumbing fixtures in any multifamily residential real property and in any commercial real property shall be replaced with water-conserving plumbing fixtures.

(b) An owner or the owner’s agent may enter the owner’s property for the purpose of installing, repairing, testing, and maintaining water-conserving plumbing fixtures required by this
 section, consistent with notice requirements of Section 1954.
